Idaho, session 2025, H0313.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1637, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1637. SUDDEN CARDIAC ARREST PREVENTION. (1) For the purposes of
this section:
(a) "Appropriate medical professional" means and includes any one (1)
of the following who is trained in the evaluation and management of sud-
den cardiac arrest:
(i) A physician or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18,
title 54, Idaho Code;
(ii) An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under section
54-1409, Idaho Code; or
(iii) A licensed health care professional trained in the evalua-
tion and management of sudden cardiac arrest who is supervised by
a directing physician who is licensed under chapter 18, title 54,
Idaho Code.
(b) "Athletic activity" means an athletic contest, competition, or
practice that is sponsored by or associated with a school, including
cheerleading, club sponsored sports activities, or sports activities
sponsored by any organization affiliated with the school.
(c) "Coach" means any employee, contractor, or volunteer responsible
for overseeing students participating in any athletic activity.
(d) "School" means all public school districts and public charter
schools in the state of Idaho.
(e) "Sudden cardiac arrest symptoms" means symptoms that include but
are not limited to:
(i) Fainting;
(ii) Seizures during exercise;
(iii) Dizziness;
(iv) Chest pain;
(v) Shortness of breath;
(vi) Racing heart rate; or
(vii) Unexplained fatigue during exercise or physical activity.
(2)(a) The state department of education shall collaborate with the
Idaho high school activities association to develop guidelines and
other relevant materials to inform and educate students participat-


ing in, or desiring to participate in, an athletic activity, as well
as their parents, guardians, and coaches, about sudden cardiac arrest
symptoms, including the risks associated with continuing to play or
practice after experiencing sudden cardiac arrest symptoms. Such mate-
rials shall include a sudden cardiac arrest symptom information sheet
that shall include a list of the sudden cardiac arrest symptoms and an
acknowledgment to be signed by both a student and such student's parent
or guardian. In developing the guidelines and materials, the state de-
partment of education may use, at no cost to the state, an educational
video created by Simon's Heart for the purpose of educating coaches
about sudden cardiac arrest. The state department of education shall
include a link on its publicly accessible internet-based website to
any such guidelines and materials that are adopted and published by the
Idaho high school activities association.
(b) A student participating in, or desiring to participate in, an ath-
letic activity and the student's parent or guardian shall, each school
year and prior to participation by the student in an athletic activity,
sign and return to the student's school an acknowledgment of receipt and
review of the sudden cardiac arrest symptoms information sheet provided
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Schools may hold an informational meeting prior to the start of each
athletic season for all ages of competitors regarding sudden cardiac
arrest symptoms. In addition to students, parents, coaches and other
school officials, informational meetings may include physicians, pedi-
atric cardiologists, and athletic trainers.
(3)(a) A student who exhibits any of the sudden cardiac arrest symptoms
provided in subsection (1)(e) of this section while participating in,
or immediately following, an athletic activity, or who is known to have
experienced any such symptoms while participating in or immediately
following an athletic activity, may be removed from participation at
that time by the coach overseeing the athletic activity if the coach
reasonably believes that such symptoms are cardiac related. Coaches
who observe such symptoms may notify the student's parent or legal
guardian so that such parent or legal guardian can determine what treat-
ment, if any, the student should seek.
(b) A student who is removed from play under the provisions of paragraph
(a) of this subsection shall not be permitted to return to participa-
tion in an athletic activity until the student is evaluated and cleared
for return to participation in writing by an appropriate medical pro-
fessional.
(4) Every coach shall complete the sudden cardiac arrest training
course produced by Simon's Heart and made available through the national
federation of state high school associations, or a comparable course pro-
duced by another provider and approved by the state department of education,
at least once each even-numbered school year. A coach shall not be eligible
to coach an athletic activity until the coach completes the training course
required under this subsection.
(5) No coach shall be subject to civil liability for such coach's ac-
tions or inactions under the provisions of this section unless such coach is
found to have acted unreasonably in a grossly negligent or reckless manner.


(6) The sponsors of youth athletic activities may, and are encouraged
to, follow the guidance provided in this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.